Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-492] Revocation of the power of
attorney for special education. (a) An adult student may revoke the
designation of an agent in writing to the supervising teacher.

(b) A teacher, agent, or guardian who is
informed of a revocation shall promptly communicate the fact of the revocation
to the supervising teacher and to any educational institution at which the
student is receiving special education services.

(c) A decree of annulment, divorce,
dissolution of marriage, or legal separation shall revoke a previous
designation of a spouse as agent unless otherwise specified in the decree or in
a power of attorney for special education.

(d) A power of attorney for special education
that conflicts with an earlier power of attorney for special education revokes
the earlier power of attorney for special education to the extent of the
conflict. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next